Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-506.01
Airport authority; treasurer; appointed; bond.

(1) An airport authority may appoint a treasurer.

(2) If a treasurer is appointed by the authority, the treasurer of the city in which such authority is established shall no longer serve as ex officio treasurer of the authority.

(3) If a treasurer is appointed, such treasurer shall furnish bond, in an amount to be determined by the authority, running to the authority conditioned upon the faithful performance of such treasurer's duties.

Laws 1978, LB 868, § 2.